Wyoming, session 2026, HB0036.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1.
(a) The state forestry division of the office of
state lands and investments is authorized twenty-four (24)
employee positions for purposes of this section. Of the
positions authorized in this subsection, four (4) shall be
full-time employee positions consisting of regional fire
managers and suppression module leaders, four (4) shall be
nine-month temporary full-time employee positions and
sixteen (16) shall be six-month temporary full-time
employee positions. It is the intent of the legislature
that the positions authorized in this subsection be
included in the office of state lands and investments'
standard budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal
biennium.
(b) There is appropriated five million one hundred
forty-four thousand dollars ($5,144,000.00) from the
general fund to the office of state lands and investments
for two (2) wildland fire suppression modules for the state
forestry program. Funds appropriated in this subsection
shall be for the positions authorized in subsection (a) of
this section, support costs, equipment and costs associated
with hiring, training, certifying and supervising two (2)
specialized teams to support wildfire suppression and
hazardous fuels reduction projects in the state. This
appropriation shall be for the period beginning with the
effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2028. This
appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0036
ENROLLED ACT NO. 25, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds
remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided
by law on June 30, 2028. It is the intent of the
legislature that, of this appropriation, one million
dollars ($1,000,000.00) not be included in the office of
state lands and investments' standard budget for the
immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.
Section 2. This act is effective April 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
2